Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-523
Public defender; election; when required; terms; qualifications; partisan ballot.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 23-3401 and 23-3404, the public defender shall, in counties having a population in excess of one hundred thousand inhabitants which have not elected a public defender prior to July 10, 1984, be elected at the next statewide general election following July 10, 1984, or the year in which the county attains a population of one hundred thousand inhabitants and shall, in other counties, be elected at the first statewide general election of county officers following approval by the county board and every four years thereafter. The term of the public defender shall be four years or until his or her successor is elected and qualified. The public defender shall meet the qualifications found in section 23-3401. The public defender shall be elected on the partisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 119.